Maryland, session 2025, HB0371.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
7–302.
(e) (4) (i) Except as provided in paragraph (5) of this subsection, from the
fines collected by a political subdivision as a result of violations enforced by speed
monitoring systems, work zone speed control systems, stop sign monitoring systems, school
bus monitoring cameras, bus lane monitoring systems, or noise abatement monitoring
systems, a political subdivision:
1. May recover the costs of implementing and administering
the speed monitoring systems, work zone speed control systems, school bus monitoring
cameras, bus lane monitoring systems, or noise abatement monitoring systems; and
2. Subject to subparagraphs [(ii), (iii), and (iv)] (II)
THROUGH (VII) of this paragraph, may spend any remaining balance solely for public
safety purposes, including pedestrian or highway safety programs.
(ii) 1. For any fiscal year, if the balance remaining from the fines
collected by a political subdivision as a result of violations enforced by speed monitoring
systems, after the costs of implementing and administering the systems are recovered in
accordance with subparagraph (i)1 of this paragraph, is greater than 10% of the total
revenues of the political subdivision for the fiscal year, the political subdivision shall remit
any funds that exceed 10% of the total revenues to the Comptroller.
2. The Comptroller shall deposit any money remitted under
this subparagraph to the General Fund of the State.

HOUSE BILL 371 3
(iii) The fines collected by Prince George’s County as a result of
violations enforced by speed monitoring systems on Maryland Route 210 shall be remitted
to the Comptroller for distribution to the State Highway Administration to be used solely
to assist in covering the costs of:
1. Examining the engineering, infrastructure, and other
relevant factors that may contribute to safety issues on Maryland Route 210 in Prince
George’s County;
2. Reporting its findings and recommendations on any
solutions to these safety issues; and
3. Implementing any solutions to these safety issues.
(iv) 1. From the fines collected by Baltimore City as a result of
violations enforced by speed monitoring systems on Interstate 83, any balance remaining
after the allocation of fines under subparagraph (i)1 of this paragraph shall be remitted to
the Comptroller for distribution to the Baltimore City Department of Transportation to be
used solely to assist in covering the cost of roadway improvements on Interstate 83 in
Baltimore City.
2. Fines remitted to the Baltimore City Department of
Transportation under subsubparagraph 1 of this subparagraph are supplemental to and
are not intended to take the place of funding that would otherwise be appropriated for uses
described under subsubparagraph 1 of this subparagraph.
(v) From the fines collected by Anne Arundel County as a result of
violations enforced by speed monitoring systems on Maryland Route 175 (Jessup Road)
between the Maryland Route 175/295 interchange and the Anne Arundel County–Howard
County line, any balance remaining after the allocation of fines under subparagraph (i)1 of
this paragraph shall be remitted to the Comptroller for distribution to the State Highway
Administration to be used solely to assist in covering the cost of speed reduction measures
and roadway and pedestrian safety improvements on Maryland Route 175 (Jessup Road)
between the Maryland Route 175/295 interchange and the Anne Arundel County–Howard
County line.
(vi) From the fines collected by the Town of Oxford as a result of
violations enforced by speed monitoring systems at the intersection of Maryland Route 333
(Oxford Road) and Bonfield Avenue in Talbot County, any balance remaining after the
allocation of fines under subparagraph (i)1 of this paragraph shall be remitted to the
Comptroller for distribution to the State Highway Administration to be used solely to assist
in covering the cost of roadway and pedestrian safety improvements in and around the
intersection of Maryland Route 333 (Oxford Road) and Bonfield Avenue.
(VII) FROM THE FINES COLLECTED BY PRINCE GEORGE’S
COUNTY AS A RESULT OF VIOLATIONS ENFORCED BY SPEED MONITORING SYSTEMS
ON MARYLAND ROUTE 5 IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY, ANY BALANCE REMAINING

HOUSE BILL 371
AFTER THE ALLOCATION OF FINES UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I)1 OF THIS PARAGRAPH
SHALL BE REMITTED TO THE COMPTROLLER FOR DISTRIBUTION TO THE STATE
HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION TO BE USED, IN CONSULTATION WITH PRINCE
GEORGE’S COUNTY, SOLELY FOR STATE AND LOCAL HIGHWAY AND PEDESTRIAN
SAFETY IMPROVEMENTS ON AND IN THE VICINITY OF MARYLAND ROUTE 5 IN
PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY.
Article – Transportation
21–809.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(8) “Speed monitoring system” means a device with one or more motor
vehicle sensors producing recorded images of motor vehicles traveling at speeds at least 12
miles per hour above the posted speed limit.
(b) (1) (i) A speed monitoring system may not be used in a local jurisdiction
under this section unless its use is authorized by the governing body of the local jurisdiction
by local law enacted after reasonable notice and a public hearing.
(v) An ordinance or resolution adopted by the governing body of a
local jurisdiction under this paragraph shall provide that, if the local jurisdiction moves or
places a mobile or stationary speed monitoring system to or at a location where a speed
monitoring system had not previously been moved or placed, the local jurisdiction may not
issue a citation for a violation recorded by that speed monitoring system:
1. Until signage is installed in accordance with
subparagraph (viii) of this paragraph; and
2. For at least the first 15 calendar days after the signage is
installed.
(vi) This section applies to a violation of this subtitle recorded by a
speed monitoring system that meets the requirements of this subsection and has been
placed:
1. In Anne Arundel County, Montgomery County, or Prince
George’s County, on a highway in a residential district, as defined in § 21–101 of this title,
with a maximum posted speed limit of 35 miles per hour, which speed limit was established
using generally accepted traffic engineering practices;
2. In a school zone with a posted speed limit of at least 20
miles per hour;
3. In Prince George’s County:

HOUSE BILL 371 5
A. Subject to subparagraph (vii)1 of this paragraph, on
Maryland Route 210 (Indian Head Highway); [or]
B. ON MARYLAND ROUTE 5; OR
C. On that part of a highway located within the grounds of
an institution of higher education as defined in § 10–101(h) of the Education Article, or
within one–half mile of the grounds of a building or property used by the institution of
higher education where generally accepted traffic and engineering practices indicate that
motor vehicle, pedestrian, or bicycle traffic is substantially generated or influenced by the
institution of higher education;
4. Subject to subparagraph (vii)2 of this paragraph, on
Interstate 83 in Baltimore City;
5. In Anne Arundel County, on Maryland Route 175 (Jessup
Road) between the Maryland Route 175/295 interchange and the Anne Arundel
County–Howard County line; or
6. Subject to subparagraph (vii)3 of this paragraph, at the
intersection of Maryland Route 333 (Oxford Road) and Bonfield Avenue in Talbot County.
(vii) 1. Not more than six mobile or stationary speed monitoring
systems may be placed on Maryland Route 210 (Indian Head Highway).
2. Not more than two speed monitoring systems may be
placed on Interstate 83 in Baltimore City.
3. Not more than one speed monitoring system may be placed
at the intersection of Maryland Route 333 (Oxford Road) and Bonfield Avenue in Talbot
County.
(viii) Before activating a speed monitoring system, the local
jurisdiction shall:
1. Publish notice of the location of the speed monitoring
system on its website and in a newspaper of general circulation in the jurisdiction;
2. Ensure that each sign that designates a school zone is
proximate to a sign that:
A. Indicates that speed monitoring systems are in use in the
school zone; and

HOUSE BILL 371
B. Is in accordance with the manual for and the specifications
for a uniform system of traffic control devices adopted by the State Highway Administration
under § 25–104 of this article;
3. With regard to a speed monitoring system established on
Maryland Route 210 (Indian Head Highway) OR MARYLAND ROUTE 5 in Prince George’s
County, based on proximity to an institution of higher education under subparagraph (vi)3
of this paragraph, on Interstate 83 in Baltimore City, in Anne Arundel County on Maryland
Route 175 (Jessup Road) between the Maryland Route 175/295 interchange and the Anne
Arundel County–Howard County line, or at the intersection of Maryland Route 333 (Oxford
Road) and Bonfield Avenue in Talbot County, ensure that all speed limit signs approaching
and within the segment of highway on which the speed monitoring system is located include
signs that:
A. Are in accordance with the manual and specifications for
a uniform system of traffic control devices adopted by the State Highway Administration
under § 25–104 of this article; and
B. Indicate that a speed monitoring system is in use; and
4. With regard to a speed monitoring system placed on
Maryland Route 210 (Indian Head Highway) OR MARYLAND ROUTE 5 in Prince George’s
County, Interstate 83 in Baltimore City, in Anne Arundel County on Maryland Route 175
(Jessup Road) between the Maryland Route 175/295 interchange and the Anne Arundel
County–Howard County line, or at the intersection of Maryland Route 333 (Oxford Road)
and Bonfield Avenue in Talbot County, ensure that each sign that indicates that a speed
monitoring system is in use is proximate to a device that displays a real–time posting of
the speed at which a driver is traveling.
(c) (1) Unless the driver of the motor vehicle received a citation from a police
officer at the time of the violation, the owner or, in accordance with subsection (f)(4) of this
section, the driver of a motor vehicle is subject to a civil penalty if the motor vehicle is
recorded by a speed monitoring system while being operated in violation of this subtitle.
(2) A civil penalty under this subsection may not exceed $40.
(3) For purposes of this section, the District Court shall prescribe:
(i) A uniform citation form consistent with subsection (d)(1) of this
section and § 7–302 of the Courts Article; and
(ii) A civil penalty, which shall be indicated on the citation, to be paid
by persons who choose to prepay the civil penalty without appearing in District Court.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:

HOUSE BILL 371 7
Article – Transportation
21–809.
(b) (1) (vii) Before activating a speed monitoring system, the local
jurisdiction shall:
1. Publish notice of the location of the speed monitoring
system on its website and in a newspaper of general circulation in the jurisdiction;
2. Ensure that each sign that designates a school zone is
proximate to a sign that:
A. Indicates that speed monitoring systems are in use in the
school zone; and
B. Is in accordance with the manual for and the specifications
for a uniform system of traffic control devices adopted by the State Highway Administration
under § 25–104 of this article; [and]
3. With regard to a speed monitoring system established ON
MARYLAND ROUTE 5 IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY OR based on proximity to an
institution of higher education under subparagraph (vi)3 of this paragraph, ensure that all
speed limit signs approaching and within the segment of highway on which the speed
monitoring system is located include signs that:
A. Are in accordance with the manual and specifications for
a uniform system of traffic control devices adopted by the State Highway Administration
under § 25–104 of this article; and
B. Indicate that a speed monitoring system is in use; AND
4. WITH REGARD TO A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM
PLACED ON MARYLAND ROUTE 5 IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY, ENSURE THAT
EACH SIGN THAT INDICATES THAT A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM IS IN USE IS
PROXIMATE TO A DEVICE THAT DISPLAYS A REAL–TIME POSTING OF THE SPEED AT
WHICH A DRIVER IS TRAVELING.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall take
effect October 1, 2028, the termination date of Chapter 806 of the Acts of the General
Assembly of 2018, as amended by Chapter 606 of the Acts of the General Assembly of 2023.
If the termination date of Chapter 806 is amended, Section 2 of this Act shall take effect on
the termination of Chapter 806. This Act may not be interpreted to have any effect on that
termination provision.

HOUSE BILL 371
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in Section
3 of this Act, this Act shall take effect October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.